District of Columbia statutes.
21-2003

Standard of proof.

In proceedings under this chapter for the appointment of a guardian or conservator, either general or limited, or subsequent proceedings in which the powers of a guardian or conservator are sought to be enlarged, the petitioner or moving party shall present clear and convincing evidence that the appointment or enlargement of powers is warranted.

History

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-2003.

Editor's Notes

For legislative history of D.C. Law 6-204, see Historical and Statutory Notes following § 21-2001.